bg-BG: Тип електрически конектор за автомобил: С 1 щифт; С 2 щифта; С 3 щифта; С 4 щифта; Без щепсел/терминал (оголен); Овален щепсел; Кабелни накрайници; Правоъгълен щепсел; Плоски клеми; Друго
fr: Type de connecteur électrique de l’alternateur: À 1 broche; À 2 broches; À 3 broches; À 4 broches; Sans fiche/borne (dénudée); Fiche ovale; Fils de raccordement; Fiche rectangulaire; Cosses plates; Autre
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อไฟฟ้าของยานยนต์: 1 พิน; 2 พิน; 3 พิน; 4 พิน; ไม่มีปลั๊ก/ขั้ว (สายเปลือย); ปลั๊กวงรี; สายไฟพิกเทล; ปลั๊กสี่เหลี่ยม; ขั้วเสียบแบบแบน; อื่นๆ
sv: Typ av elektrisk anslutning för fordon: 1-stifts; 2-stifts; 3-stifts; 4-stifts; Ingen kontakt/kabelände (bar); Oval kontakt; Pigtail-kablar; Rektangulär kontakt; Flatstift; Övrigt
pl: Typ złącza elektrycznego pojazdu: 1-pinowy; 2-pinowy; 3-pinowy; 4-pinowy; Brak wtyku/zacisku (goły); Wtyk owalny; Wyprowadzenia z przewodami; Wtyk prostokątny; Złącza wsuwkowe; Inne
es: Tipo de conector eléctrico del vehículo: 1 pin; 2 pines; 3 pines; 4 pines; Sin enchufe/terminal (descubierto); Enchufe ovalado; Cables pigtail; Enchufe rectangular; Terminales de horquilla; Otro
hr-HR: Električni mehanizam vozila tipa sinkronizacije: 1-pinski; 2-pinski; 3-pinski; 4-pinski; Bez utikača/priključka (goli utikač); Ovalni utikač; Kabeli s priključkom (Pigtail); Pravokutni utikač; Viljuškasti priključci; Ostalo
ru: Тип электрического разъема транспортного средства: 1-контактный; 2-контактный; 3-контактный; 4-контактный; Без штекера/клеммы (оголенный); Овальный штекер; Разъем с проводами; Прямоугольный штекер; Ножевые клеммы; Другое
zh-CN: 车辆电气连接器类型: 1 针; 2 针; 3 针; 4 针; 无插头/端子 (裸线); 椭圆形插头; 尾纤引线; 矩形插头; 铲形端子; 其他
nl: Voertuig elektrische connectortype: 1-pins; 2-pins; 3-pins; 4-pins; Geen stekker/klem (kaal); Ovale stekker; Pigtail-kabels; Rechthoekige stekker; Kabelschoenen; Overig
pt-BR: Veículo conector elétrico tipo: 1 pino; 2 pinos; 3 pinos; 4 pinos; Sem plugue/terminal (desencapado); Plugue oval; Fios tipo pigtail; Plugue retangular; Terminais tipo espada; Outro
hu: Jármű elektromos csatlakozójának típusa: 1 pólusú; 2 pólusú; 3 pólusú; 4 pólusú; Nincs dugó / csatlakozó (csupasz); Ovális dugó; Kivezetett vezetékek; Téglalap alakú dugó; Lapos saruk; Egyéb
ko: 차량용 전기 커넥터 유형: 1핀; 2핀; 3핀; 4핀; 플러그/단자 없음(베어); 타원형 플러그; 피그테일 리드; 직사각형 플러그; 스페이드 단자; 기타
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės elektros jungčių tipas: 1 kontakto; 2 kontaktų; 3 kontaktų; 4 kontaktų; Be kištuko / gnybto (atviri); Ovalo formos kištukas; Laidų atšakos; Stačiakampis kištukas; Plokštieji gnybtai; Kita
fi: Ajoneuvon sähköliittimen tyyppi: 1-nastainen; 2-nastainen; 3-nastainen; 4-nastainen; Ei pistoketta/liitintä (paljas); Soikea pistoke; Vapaat johdinpäät; Suorakulmainen pistoke; Lattaliittimet; Muu
it: Tipo di connettore elettrico del veicolo: 1 pin; 2 pin; 3 pin; 4 pin; Nessuna spina/terminale (nudo); Spina ovale; Cavi pigtail; Spina rettangolare; Terminali a forcella; Altro
en: Vehicle electrical connector type: 1-pin; 2-pin; 3-pin; 4-pin; No plug/terminal (bare); Oval plug; Pigtail leads; Rectangular plug; Spade terminals; Other
da: Type af elektrisk stik til køretøj: 1-bens; 2-bens; 3-bens; 4-bens; Intet stik/terminal (blottet); Ovalt stik; Pigtail-ledninger; Firkantet stik; Spadestik; Andet
sk-SK: Typ elektrického konektora vozidla: 1-pinový; 2-pinový; 3-pinový; 4-pinový; Bez konektora/koncovky (holé vodiče); Oválny konektor; Káblové vývody; Obdĺžnikový konektor; Nožové koncovky; Iné
ja: 車両用電気コネクタータイプ: 1 ピン; 2 ピン; 3 ピン; 4 ピン; プラグ/端子なし (むき出し); 楕円形プラグ; ピッグテールリード; 長方形プラグ; 平型端子; その他
tr: Araç elektrik konnektör tipi: 1 pimli; 2 pimli; 3 pimli; 4 pimli; Fiş/terminal yok (çıplak); Oval fiş; Pigtail kablolar; Dikdörtgen fiş; Çatal terminaller; Diğer
zh-TW: 車輛電子接頭類型: 1 針; 2 針; 3 針; 4 針; 無插頭/端子 (裸線); 橢圓形插頭; 引線; 矩形插頭; 扁平端子; 其他
cs: Typ elektrického konektoru vozidla: 1pinový; 2pinový; 3pinový; 4pinový; Bez zástrčky / terminálu (holé); Oválná zástrčka; Připojovací kabely (pigtail); Obdélníková zástrčka; Ploché konektory; Jiné
vi: Loại kết nối điện xe: 1 chân; 2 chân; 3 chân; 4 chân; Không có phích cắm/đầu cốt (dây trần); Phích cắm hình bầu dục; Dây nối (Pigtail); Phích cắm hình chữ nhật; Đầu cốt chữ U (Spade); Khác
nb: Type elektrisk tilkobling for kjøretøy: 1-pins; 2-pins; 3-pins; 4-pins; Uten plugg/terminal (bar); Oval plugg; Pigtail-ledninger; Rektangulær plugg; Spadeterminaler; Annet
ro-RO: Tipul de conector electric auto: 1 pin; 2 pini; 3 pini; 4 pini; Fără conector/terminal (cablu neizolat); Conector oval; Cabluri pigtail; Conector dreptunghiular; Conectori tip papuc; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de conector elétrico do veículo: 1 pino; 2 pinos; 3 pinos; 4 pinos; Sem ficha/terminal (desnudado); Ficha oval; Cabos pigtail; Ficha retangular; Terminais de forquilha; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta električnega priključka vozila: 1-pinski; 2-pinski; 3-pinski; 4-pinski; Brez vtiča/priključka (goli); Ovalni vtič; Žični priključki (pigtail); Pravokotni vtič; Ploščati priključki; Drugo
el: Τύπος ηλεκτρικού συνδέσμου οχήματος: 1 ακίδας; 2 ακίδων; 3 ακίδων; 4 ακίδων; Χωρίς βύσμα/τερματικό (γυμνό); Οβάλ βύσμα; Καλώδια pigtail; Ορθογώνιο βύσμα; Ακροδέκτες φις (spade); Άλλο
de: Art des elektrischen Fahrzeuganschlusses: 1-polig; 2-polig; 3-polig; 4-polig; Kein Stecker/Anschluss (blank); Ovaler Stecker; Pigtail-Kabel; Rechteckiger Stecker; Flachsteckhülsen; Sonstiges